Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 15.082, is amended to read: 15.082 OBLIGATIONS OF PUBLIC CORPORATIONS. Notwithstanding any other law, the state is not liable for obligations of a public corporation created by statute. Upon dissolution of the public corporation, its wholly owned assets become state property. Partially owned assets become state property to the extent that state money was used to acquire them. This section does not apply to a public corporation governed by chapter 119new text begin or section 469.0121new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462A.202, subdivision 3a, is amended to read: Subd. 3a. Permanent rental housing. The agency may make loans, with or without interest, to cities and counties to finance the construction, acquisition, or rehabilitation of affordable, permanent, new text begin and new text end publicly owned rental housingnew text begin , including housing owned by a public corporation created pursuant to section 469.0121new text end . Loans made under this subdivision are subject to the restrictions of subdivision 7. In making loans under this subdivision, the agency shall give priority to projects that increase the supply of affordable family housing. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462C.02, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. City. "City" means any statutory or home rule charter city, a county housing and redevelopment authority created by special law or authorized by its county to exercise its powers pursuant to section 469.004, or any public body which (a) is the housing and redevelopment authority in and for a statutory or home rule charter city, the port authority of a statutory or home rule charter city, deleted text begin ordeleted text end an economic development authority of a city established under sections 469.090 to 469.108, new text begin or a public corporation created pursuant to section 469.0121, new text end and (b) is authorized by ordinance to exercise, on behalf of a statutory or home rule charter city, the powers conferred by sections 462C.01 to 462C.10. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 469.012, subdivision 2j, is amended to read: Subd. 2j. May be in LLP, LLC, or corporation; bound as if HRA. new text begin (a) new text end An authority may become a member or shareholder in and enter into or form limited partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations for the purpose of developing, constructing, rehabilitating, managing, supporting, or preserving housing projects and housing development projects, including low-income housing tax credit projects. These limited partnerships, limited liability companies, or corporations are subject to all of the provisions of sections 469.001 to 469.047 and other laws that apply to housing and redevelopment authorities, as if the limited partnership, limited liability company, or corporation were a housing and redevelopment authority. new text begin (b) An authority may create a public corporation in accordance with section 469.0121 for the purpose of purchasing, owning, and operating real property converted through the federal Rental Assistance Demonstration program under Public Law 112-55, as amended. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin [469.0121] PUBLIC CORPORATION; RENTAL ASSISTANCE DEMONSTRATION PROGRAM. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Authority" has the meaning given under section 469.002, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) "Board" means the board of directors of a corporation created under this section. new text end new text begin (d) "Corporation" means a public corporation created under this section. new text end new text begin (e) "RAD" means the federal Rental Assistance Demonstration program under Public Law 112-55, as amended. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public corporation created. new text end new text begin An authority may create a public corporation to purchase, own, and operate real property that has been converted through RAD to preserve and improve public housing properties. A public corporation created under this section is also a political subdivision of the state and is limited to the powers in this section. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Corporation powers. new text end new text begin (a) The corporation has the following general powers: new text end new text begin (1) to have succession until dissolved by law; new text end new text begin (2) to sue and be sued in its corporate name; new text end new text begin (3) to adopt, alter, and use a corporate seal which shall be judicially noticed; new text end new text begin (4) to accept, hold, and administer gifts and bequests of money, securities, or other personal property of whatsoever character, absolutely or in trust, for the purposes for which the corporation is created. Unless otherwise restricted by the terms of the gift or bequest, the corporation is authorized to sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of and to invest or reinvest in such investments as the corporation may determine with the money, securities, or other property given or bequeathed to the corporation. The principal of and income from the corporate funds and all other revenues received by the corporation from any source whatsoever shall be placed in such depositories as the board of directors shall determine and shall be subject to expenditure for corporate purposes; new text end new text begin (5) to enter into contracts generally and to execute all instruments necessary or appropriate to carry out the corporate purposes; new text end new text begin (6) to appoint and prescribe the duties of officers, agents, and employees as may be necessary to carry out the work of the corporation and to compensate officers, agents, and employees; new text end new text begin (7) to purchase all supplies and materials necessary for carrying out the purposes of the corporation; new text end new text begin (8) to accept from the United States, the state of Minnesota, or any of their agencies money or other assistance whether by gift, loan, or otherwise to carry out the purposes of the corporation, and enter into contracts with the United States, the state of Minnesota, any of the agencies of either, or any of the political subdivisions of the state as it may deem proper and consistent with the purposes of this section; new text end new text begin (9) to contract and make cooperative agreements with federal, state, and municipal departments and agencies and private corporations, associations, and individuals for the use of the corporation property, including but not limited to rental agreements; and new text end new text begin (10) to acquire real or personal property or any interest therein in any manner authorized under section 469.012, subdivision 1g, including by the exercise of eminent domain. new text end new text begin (b) A corporation may acquire properties converted under RAD, subject to restrictions and conditions compatible with funding acquisitions of and improvements to real property with state general obligation bond proceeds. The commissioner of management and budget must determine the necessary restrictions and conditions under this paragraph. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Board of directors. new text end new text begin (a) A corporation is governed by a board of directors, with each commissioner of the authority that created the corporation serving as a member. new text end new text begin (b) The term of a director shall coincide with their term as a commissioner of the authority that created the corporation, except that a director's term shall continue after their term as a commissioner is complete until a successor commissioner is duly appointed and qualified. new text end new text begin (c) Board members must not be compensated for their service as board members but may receive reimbursement for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with their duties as board members. The state auditor must review the reimbursements to board members each year. new text end new text begin (d) The board must annually elect from among its members a chair and other officers necessary for the performance of its duties. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Bylaws. new text end new text begin The board of directors must adopt bylaws and rules as it deems necessary for the administration of its functions and the accomplishment of its purpose, including among other matters the establishment of a business office and the rules, the use of the project-based rental assistance properties, and the administration of corporation funds. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Place of business. new text end new text begin The board must locate and maintain the corporation's place of business in the city in which the authority that created the corporation is located. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Open meetings; data practices. new text end new text begin Meetings of the board are subject to chapter 13D and meetings of the board conducted by interactive technology are subject to section 13D.02. The board is subject to chapter 13, the Minnesota Government Data Practices Act, and shall protect data classified as not public from unlawful disclosure. new text end new text begin Subd. 8. new text end new text begin Compliance. new text end new text begin The corporation must comply with all federal, state, and local laws, rules, ordinances, and other regulations required to own and operate properties as project-based rental assistance properties. new text end new text begin Subd. 9. new text end new text begin Dissolution. new text end new text begin Upon dissolution of the corporation for any reason, its wholly owned assets become property of the authority that created the corporation. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end